Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3801
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-3801 to 71-3816 shall be known and may be cited as the Kratom Consumer Protection Act.

Laws 2025, LB230, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB901, § 9.
July 18, 2026